Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1068
Service of order of injunction; when not required.

The order of injunction shall be addressed to the party enjoined, shall state the injunction, and shall be issued by the clerk. Where the injunction is allowed at the commencement of the action, the clerk shall endorse upon the summons injunction allowed, and it shall not be necessary to issue the order of injunction; nor shall it be necessary to issue the same where notice of the application therefor has been given to the party enjoined. The service of the summons so endorsed, or the notice of the application for an injunction, shall be notice of its allowance.

R.S.1867, Code § 256, p. 436;

R.S.1913, § 7797;

C.S.1922, § 8741;

C.S.1929, § 20-1068;

R.S.1943, § 25-1068.

For endorsement by sheriff showing time he or she received the summons, see section 23-1701.05.

Summons endorsed, injunction allowed, is sufficient notice of order. State ex rel. Minden-Edison Light & Power Co. v. Dungan, 89 Neb. 738, 132 N.W. 305 (1911).